Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 25

Department of Veterans Services

4-3-2501. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of veterans services.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 1; 1959, ch. 9, § 6; 1975, ch. 249, § 1; modified; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 1, 7.

Compiler's Notes. The department of veterans services, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 8 provides that the department of veterans services may exhaust the existing stock of office products having the designation of the department or commissioner of veterans’ affairs prior to ordering new office products having the designation authorized by this act.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of veterans services, §4-3-101.

War records furnished to department of veterans services by war records bureau, §58-4-101.

4-3-2502. Commissioner.

The department of veterans services is under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of veterans services.

Acts 1945, ch. 40, § 4; 1959, ch. 9, § 6; 1975, ch. 249, § 2; modified; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 1, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

4-3-2503. Powers and duties.

The department of veterans services and the commissioner of veterans services are vested with all the authority, powers and duties formerly imposed upon the staff division of veterans' affairs and the director of the department of veterans' affairs and as prescribed in title 58, chapter 3.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 6; 1975, ch. 249, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-331; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 2, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 8 provides that the department of veterans services may exhaust the existing stock of office products having the designation of the department or commissioner of veterans’ affairs prior to ordering new office products having the designation authorized by this act.

Cross-References. Commission on aging and disability, commissioner as member, §71-2-104.

Veterans' cemeteries, title 46, ch. 6.

4-3-2504. Youth programs — Department's activity restricted.

The department of veterans services is prohibited from developing, coordinating, administering, supervising or in any way assisting in the implementation or operation of the Tennessee Tomorrow Program or any other youth-in-public-service program. No funds that may be appropriated, transferred or otherwise made available to the department shall be expended or in any way utilized by the department on behalf of such programs.

Acts 1981, ch. 45, § 2; 2015, ch. 24, §§ 1, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans’ affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.